Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-403
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Health and Human Services, Office of Juvenile Services Act:

(1) Aftercare means the control, supervision, and care exercised over juveniles who have been discharged from commitment;

(2) Committed means an order by a court committing a juvenile to the care and custody of the Office of Juvenile Services for treatment at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center identified in the court order;

(3) Community supervision means the control, supervision, and care exercised over juveniles when a commitment to the level of treatment of a youth rehabilitation and treatment center has not been ordered by the court;

(4) Emergency, for purposes of sections 43-427 to 43-430, means a public health emergency or a situation, including fire, flood, tornado, natural disaster, or damage to a youth rehabilitation and treatment center, that renders the youth rehabilitation and treatment center uninhabitable. Emergency does not include inadequate staffing;

(5) Evaluation means assessment of the juvenile's social, physical, psychological, and educational development and needs, including a recommendation as to an appropriate treatment plan; and

(6) Treatment means the type of supervision, care, and rehabilitative services provided for the juvenile at a youth rehabilitation and treatment center operated by the Office of Juvenile Services.

Laws 1998, LB 1073, § 35;

Laws 2020, LB1140, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB1188, § 2;

Laws 2021, LB273, § 2.